Alaska, session 34, SB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 37.05.590 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 37.05.590. Civil legal services fund. The civil legal services fund is 05 established as a special account in the general fund. The fund consists of 06 appropriations to it. Annually, the legislature may appropriate to the fund only from 07 amounts deposited into the general fund of the state under AS 09.17.020(j) and an 08 amount from the general fund that is up to 25 [10] percent of the filing fees received 09 by the Alaska Court System during the previous closed fiscal year. The legislature 10 may make appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal 11 services to low-income individuals. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. In 12 this section, "low-income individual" means an individual with an income equal to or 13 less than 125 percent of the most recent federal poverty guidelines for Alaska set by 14 the United States Department of Health and Human Services. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.